Washington statutes.
RCW 27.34.240

Apportionment of grants.

The amounts made available for grants to the public agencies, public or private organizations, or individuals for projects for each fiscal year shall be apportioned among program applicants by the director or the director's designee, with the advice of the preservation officer, in accordance with needs as contained in statewide archaeology and historic preservation plans developed by the department.

[ 1986 c 266 s 13; 1983 c 91 s 14.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.